West Virginia, session 2025, HB2814.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. THE GOVERNOR. §5-1-31. Crisis preparedness plans. (a) The Legislature finds that the government of West Virginia must be prepared for major crises that pose existential or major threats to the people of West Virginia.(b) The Legislature finds that the global and national situations have become the most critical in decades. (c) To protect West Virginia, the Governor will develop comprehensive whole-of-government plans to deal with crises that can pose existential or major threats to the people and governance of West Virginia.  The following types of crises will be priorities:(1) Nuclear war, including nuclear strikes inside West Virginia;(2) Major disruptions of the energy grid in West Virginia, including disruptions resulting from high altitude electromagnetic pulse (HEMP) attacks, cyber-attacks, or physical attacks on key grid systems; (3) Major cyber-attacks creating long term disruptions to West Virginia's communications systems; (4) Invasion; and (5) Insurrection.(d) Plans created under subsection (c) of this section must include: (1) Preventative measures the state government can take to pre-empt the impact of the crises;(2) Mitigation measures;(3) Immediate response;(4) Remediation; and (5) Recovery.(e) The Department of Homeland Security will brief the Interim Joint Standing Committee on Government Organization no later than August 31, 2025, on tentative plans, and measures the state government is taking to facilitate the plans and additional mitigation measures the state government can take.  Final plans should be completed by November 30, 2025.  Periodic updates should be completed annually and be briefed to the Interim Joint Standing Committee on Government Organization no later than each June.